Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 4

Citizens Bonds

9-9-401. Small-denominations bonds authorized — Terms and sale — Limitations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever the state funding board is authorized to issue and sell bonds of the state, it may by resolution authorize the issuance and sale of all or any portion of such bonds in denominations of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), to be known as “Tennessee citizens bonds,” hereinafter referred to as “citizens bonds.” Such bonds shall be issued and sold by the state funding board through the state treasurer either at public or private sale, maturing in such amounts and upon such dates, at such interest rate or rates, payable at such time and in such manner, at par or at discount, in bearer or registered form, and upon such other terms and conditions as shall be determined to be in the best interests of the state in accordance with a plan approved by resolution of the funding board. It is the legislative intent that the interest rate set by the funding board on the sale of citizens bonds shall be approximately the same yield to the investor as was available from the most recent sale of general obligation bonds.

Not more than two million dollars ($2,000,000) principal amount of citizens bonds shall be sold by the state treasurer in any one (1) fiscal year. If sold at discount, the discount of such bonds may not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the bond's value at maturity, and the principal amount shall be the discounted value for which the bonds are sold. The face value of citizens bonds sold at discount will be the principal amount and all interest which will be owed on the bond if it is held to full maturity. The maximum rate of interest in no instance shall exceed the legal rate as provided in § 47-14-103. No citizens bond shall mature more than five (5) years after its date of issue. Each citizens bond shall provide that it will be redeemed by the state, upon due presentation by the appropriate person on any business day after its date of sale by the state treasurer, at such price as the state treasurer shall determine according to a schedule established with respect to each issue of citizens bonds prior to the sale thereof.

It is the legislative intent that the aggregate principal amount of citizens bonds sold to an individual purchaser should not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) of the primary sale during any fiscal year. Citizens bonds shall be executed in the name of the state by the state treasurer, either manually or by facsimile signature and shall be countersigned by the secretary of state, with the great seal of the state or a facsimile thereof attached thereto. The secretary of state may direct that the secretary of state's signature be placed on citizens bonds by mechanical or electronic device at the time of issuance.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 1; 1981, ch. 46, § 1.

9-9-402. Application of part.

This part shall be applicable to all general obligation bonds which have been authorized but which remain unissued on February 22, 1980, and all subsequent authorizations for general obligation bonds.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 2.

9-9-403. Bonds and interest tax-exempt — Exceptions.

Citizens bonds and the interest payable thereon are exempt from taxation by the state of Tennessee and each county, municipality and taxing district of the state, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 3.

Cross-References. Gift, estate, and inheritance taxes, title 67, ch. 8, parts 1-5.

9-9-404. Issuance and sale to conform to other laws.

Except as otherwise authorized by this part, citizens bonds shall be issued and sold in conformity with the terms and conditions specified in this chapter and the provisions of the law authorizing the particular bond issue for which such citizens bonds are authorized by the funding board.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 4.

9-9-405. Redemption of citizens bonds.

Whenever the state treasurer is authorized pursuant to §9-9-401 to sell citizens bonds, the state treasurer is also specifically authorized to redeem those citizens bonds, whenever under the terms of the bond sale they are lawfully presented to the state treasurer, from funds available to the state treasurer and be reimbursed for such redemptions from available funds in the state's debt service fund.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 5; 2003, ch. 10, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 10, § 3 provided that any language inconsistent with the provisions in this section in any general obligation bond enacted prior to April 2, 2003, shall be of no effect.

9-9-406. Rules and regulations.

The state treasurer is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations which are consistent with the plan approved by the state funding board pursuant to §9-9-401 to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1980, ch. 480, § 6.